Illinois, session 104th, HB5803.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-46025 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-46025)7    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 8delayed effective date)9    Sec. 5-46025. Applicability.10    (a) As used in this Section, "shared roof" means any roof 11that (i) serves more than one unit, including, but not limited 12to, a contiguous roof serving adjacent units, or (ii) is part 13of the common elements or common area of a unit.14    (b) This Division shall not apply to any building that:15        (1) is greater than 60 feet in height; or16        (2) has a shared roof.17    (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this Section, this 18Division shall apply to any building with a shared roof:19        (1) where the solar energy system is located entirely 20    within that portion of the shared roof that is owned and 21    maintained by the property owner;22        (2) where all property owners sharing the shared roof 23    are in agreement to install a solar energy system; or  HB5803- 2 -LRB104 21835 TRT 37622 b1        (3) to the extent this Division applies to low-voltage 2    solar-powered devices.3    (d) This Division shall not apply to a commercial solar 4energy system as defined in Section 10-720 of the Property Tax 5Code.6(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 7    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 8changing Section 11-15.5-25 as follows: 9    (65 ILCS 5/11-15.5-25)10    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 11delayed effective date)12    Sec. 11-15.5-25. Applicability.13    (a) As used in this Section, "shared roof" means any roof 14that (i) serves more than one unit, including, but not limited 15to, a contiguous roof serving adjacent units, or (ii) is part 16of the common elements or common area of a unit.17    (b) This Division shall not apply to any building that:18        (1) is greater than 60 feet in height; or19        (2) has a shared roof.20    (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this Section, this 21Division shall apply to any building with a shared roof:22        (1) where the solar energy system is located entirely 23    within that portion of the shared roof owned and 24    maintained by the property owner;  HB5803- 3 -LRB104 21835 TRT 37622 b1        (2) where all property owners sharing the shared roof 2    are in agreement to install a solar energy system; or3        (3) to the extent this Division applies to low-voltage 4    solar-powered devices.5    (d) This Division shall not apply to a commercial solar 6energy system as defined in Section 10-720 of the Property Tax 7Code. 8(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 9    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 10changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 11that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 12represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 13not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 14made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 15Public Act.